src/fst/syllabification/hyphenation.xfscript
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ======================== !
! Hyphenator for Pite Sámi !
! ======================== !
! This one is taken from Lule Sámi and should be adjusted.
! Most things should be the same, though.

echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>

define Vow       [ a | á | e | i | o | u | y | æ | ø | å | ä | ö |
                   A | Á | E | I | O | U | Y | Æ | Ø | Å | Ä | Ö |
é | ó | ú | í | à | è | ò | ù | ì | ë | ü | ï | â | ê | ô | û | î | ã | ý
É | Ó | Ú | Í | À | È | Ò | Ù | Ì | Ë | Ü | Ï | Â | Ê | Ô | Û | Î | Ã | Ý ] ;

define 2ndVow [ e | a | o | u | y | ø | i | E | A | O | U | Y | Ø | I ] ;

define VowNot2ndVow [ Vow - 2ndVow ] ;

define vU     [ u | U ] ;
define vO     [ o | O ] ;
define vA     [ a | A ] ;
define vE     [ e | E ] ;
define vI     [ i | I ] ;
define vAO    [ a | A | o | O ] ;
define vAEIO  [ a | A | e | E | i | I | o | O ] ;
define vAEOU [ a | A | e | E | o | O | u | U ] ;
define vØ     [ ø | Ø | ö | Ö ] ;
define vIØ     [ i | I | ø | Ø | ö | Ö ] ;
define vYØ     [ y | Y | ø | Ø | ö | Ö ] ;
define vIOU   [ i | I | o | O | u | U ] ;

define VowNotU [ Vow - vU ] ;
define VowNotO [ Vow - vO ] ;
define VowNotA [ Vow - vA ] ;
define VowNotE [ Vow - vE ] ;
define VowNotI [ Vow - vI ] ;
define VowNotØ [ Vow - vØ ] ;
define VowNotY [ Vow - vY ] ;


define IEdipht [ i e | I e | I E ] ;
define UOdipht [ u o | U o | U O ] ;
define OAdipht [ o a | O a | O A ] ;
define OUdipht [ o u | O u | O U ] ; ! jour-na-lis-sta
define AUdipht [ a u | A u | A U ] ; ! fau-na
define EUdipht [ e u | E u | E U ] ; ! leut-nánta
define AEdipht [ a e | A e | A E ] ; ! lae-sta-dius (gives: laes^ta^dius)
define ØYdipht [ ø y | Ø y | Ø Y ] ; ! nøyt-rála
define OEdipht [ o e | O e | O E ] ; ! goe-the
define IEdipht [ i e | I e | I E ] ; ! skiøld
define IOdipht [ i o | I o | I O ] ; ! skiold, na-tion



define dipht [ IEdipht | UOdipht | OAdipht | OUdipht | AUdipht | EUdipht | AEdipht | ØYdipht | OEdipht | IEdipht | IOdipht ] ;

define Cns [ b | c | č | d | đ | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ŋ | ñ | ń |
             B | C | Č | D | Đ | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | Ŋ | Ñ | Ń |
             p | q | r | s | š | t | ŧ | v | w | x | z | ž |
             P | Q | R | S | Š | T | Ŧ | V | W | X | Z | Ž ] ;

!define Gem [ b b | d d | f f | g g | k k | l l | m m | n n | ŋ ŋ | ñ ñ | ń ń |
!             B B | D D | F F | G G | K K | L L | M M | N N | Ŋ Ŋ | Ñ Ñ | Ń Ń |
!             p p | r r | s s | š š | t t | ŧ ŧ | v v |
!             P P | R R | S S | Š Š | T T | Ŧ Ŧ | V V ]  ;

define cS   [ S | s ] ;
define Cnss [ Cns - cS ] ;

!define Sgm [ Cns | Vow ] ;

!define Cns [ Cnssymb | Vow i ] ;

echo << Rules>>

define befdipht   [..] -> %^ ||       Vow               _ dipht ;        ! ta^iet
define nodipht    [..] -> %^ || Cns   Vow               _ VowNot2ndVow ; ! By^ån.
define NotXUdipht [..] -> %^ || Cns [ Vow - vAEOU ]     _ vU ;           ! by^ungdom, fauna
define NotUOdipht [..] -> %^ || Cns [ Vow - vIOU ]      _ vO ;           ! fly^ost
define NotOAdipht [..] -> %^ || Cns [ Vow - vAO ]       _ vA ;           ! ni^an
define NotIEdipht [..] -> %^ || Cns [ Vow - vAEIO ]     _ vE ;           ! Le)
define NotØYdipht [..] -> %^ || Cns [ Vow - vYØ ]       _ vY ;           !
define NotIØdipht [..] -> %^ || Cns [ Vow - vIØ ]       _ vØ Sgm ;        !
!Cns VowNotU _ vO , Cns VowNotO                         _ [vA|vU] , Cns VowNotI _ vE

define rdnj4cns [..] -> %^ || Vow (Cns) r       _ d n j ;
!define unvoiced [..] -> %^ || Vow (Cns)         _ h [ n | m | l | j | r ] Vow ; tjájh-ne, buvh-le is norm
define palatal  [..] -> %^ || Vow (Cns) d       _ d j ,
                              Vow (Cns) l l     _   j ,
                              Vow (Cns) n       _ n j ,
                              Vow ([Cns - d]) d _ n j ,
                              Vow ([Cns - t]) t _ n j ;

!define dissnas [..] -> %^ || Vow [ b | d | j | l | r | v ] _ [ b m | d n | g ŋ ] Vow ; !North sámi, messes up the following rules

define gem1cns  [..] -> %^ || Vow b b       _      m                      Vow ,
                              Vow d d       _     (n) j                   Vow ,
                              Vow g g       _     [ŋ|ń|ñ]                 Vow ,
                              Vow k k       _          n                  Vow ,
                              Vow l l       _      [d|j|n|t (j) ]         Vow ,
                              Vow m m       _      [b|p]                  Vow ,
                              Vow n n       _      [ d | g | t ([j|s]) ]  Vow ,
                              Vow [ŋ|ń|ñ]
                                    [ŋ|ń|ñ] _          [g|k] (Cns)        Vow ,
                              Vow p p       _      [k|t ([j|s]) | s (j) ] Vow ,
                              Vow s s  (j)  _      [ k|m|v|n|t ]          Vow ;

define s2cns    [..] -> %^ || Vow [j|l|n|r|v|m] s        _ s (j)  (Cnss) Vow ; ! májs-stet,  (if out: májs-tet),
define Ls2cnswg [..] -> %^ || Vow [j|l|n|r|v|m]  _ s (j)  (Cnss) Vow ; ! máj-stáv
                                                         ! " Vow (Cns)" as Left Context gives må-rå-stit,
                                                         ! fá-sto, now må-rås-tit, fás-to.

! Ordered rule set: Maximise coda: 3 cns before 2 cns before 1 cns before vow:

define j4cns    [..] -> %^ || Vow  Cns Cns Cns  _ [ [s|t|n] j | t s ] Vow ;
define j3cns    [..] -> %^ || Vow  Cns Cns      _ [ [s|t|n] j | t s ] Vow ;
define j2cns    [..] -> %^ || Vow  Cns          _ [ [s|t|n] j | t s ] Vow ;
define j1cns    [..] -> %^ || Vow               _ [ [s|t|n] j | t s ] Vow ;
define 4cns     [..] -> %^ || Vow  Cns Cns  Cns _  Cns Vow ;
define 3cns     [..] -> %^ || Vow  Cns Cns      _  Cns Vow ;
define xcns     [..] -> %^ ||      x            _      Vow ;
define 2cns     [..] -> %^ || Vow  Cns          _  Cns Vow ;
define 1cns     [..] -> %^ || Vow               _  Cns Vow ;

! The philosophy here is to remove some boundaries who, when seen also in a left
! context, are parts of triphthongs, and thus should not be divided. We do it
! via restoring, in order not to mess up our diphthong rules.

define savetripht  %^ -> 0 || e _ a u ;  ! does  work...
define savetripht2 %^ -> 0 || i _ e u ;  ! does  work...
define savetripht3 %^ -> 0 || i _ o u ;  ! does  work...
define saveclitic  %# -> 0 || _ k .#. ;


define removedouble %^ -> 0 || %- _ ;
define removedouble2 %^ -> 0 || _ %- ;
define removedouble3 %# -> 0 || %- _ ;
define removedouble4 %# -> 0 || _ %- ;



echo <<Combining...>>

read regex [
    befdipht
.o. nodipht
.o. NotXUdipht
.o. NotUOdipht
.o. NotOAdipht
.o. NotIEdipht
.o. NotØYdipht
.o. NotIØdipht
.o. rdnj4cns
!.o. unvoiced
.o. palatal
.o. gem1cns
.o. s2cns
.o. Ls2cnswg
.o. j4cns
.o. j3cns
.o. j2cns
.o. j1cns
.o. 4cns
.o. 3cns
.o. xcns
.o. 2cns
.o. 1cns
.o. savetripht
.o. savetripht2
.o. savetripht3
.o. saveclitic
.o. removedouble
.o. removedouble2
.o. removedouble3
.o. removedouble4
 ] ;



!define dissnas  [..] -> %^ || Vow [ b | d | j | l | r | v ] _ [ b m | d n | g ŋ ] Vow ;

! xfst -e "source hyphenatoin.xfscript"
! invert net
! save j.fst
